Missouri, session 2026, HB3024.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 170.047, 170.048, and 170.307, RSMo, are repealed and four
new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 170.047, 170.048, 170.307, and
630.099, to read as follows:
170.047. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Jason Flatt/Avery
Reine Cantor Act".
2. (1) Beginning in the 2017-18 school year and continuing until the end of the 2022-
23 school year, any licensed educator may annually complete up to two hours of training or
professional development in youth suicide awareness and prevention as part of the
professional development hours required for state board of education certification.
(2) Beginning in the 2023-24 school year and continuing in subsequent school years,
the practicing teacher assistance programs established under section 168.400 may offer and
include at least two hours of in-service training provided by each local school district for all
practicing teachers in such district regarding suicide prevention. Each school year, all
teachers, principals, and licensed educators in each district may attend such training or
complete training on suicide prevention through self-review of suicide prevention materials.
Attendance at the training shall count as two contact hours of professional development under
section 168.021 and shall count as two hours of any other such training required under this
section.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3024 2
3. The department of elementary and secondary education shall develop guidelines
suitable for training or professional development in youth suicide awareness and prevention.
The department may develop materials that may be used for the training described under
subsection 2 of this section or may offer districts materials developed by a third party that
districts may use for the training.
4. For the 2027-28 school year and all subsequent school years, suicide
prevention training described in subdivision (2) of subsection 2 of this section and
guidelines and materials developed or used under subsection 3 of this section shall
require:
(1) Training and guidance on using the Columbia Protocol, also known as the
Columbia-Suicide Severity Rating Scale (C-SSRS), that supports suicide risk
assessment; and
(2) Training on the virtual tool developed and implemented under section
630.099 to assist teachers in knowing how and when to use the virtual tool to assist
students seeking mental health information, help, and support.
5. For purposes of this section, the term "licensed educator" shall refer to any teacher
with a certificate of license to teach issued by the state board of education or any other
educator or administrator required to maintain a professional license issued by the state board
of education.
[5.] 6. The department of elementary and secondary education may promulgate rules
and regulations to implement this section.
[6.] 7. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies
with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028.
This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to
disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2016, shall be invalid
and void.
170.048. 1. By July 1, 2018, each district shall adopt a policy for youth suicide
awareness and prevention, including plans for how the district will provide for the training
and education of its district employees.
2. Each district's policy shall address and include, but not be limited to, the following:
(1) Strategies that can help identify students who are at possible risk of suicide;
(2) Strategies and protocols for helping students at possible risk of suicide; and
(3) Protocols for responding to a suicide death.

HB 3024 3
3. By July 1, 2017, the department of elementary and secondary education shall
develop a model policy that districts may adopt. When developing the model policy, the
department shall cooperate, consult with, and seek input from organizations that have
expertise in youth suicide awareness and prevention. By July 1, 2021, and at least every three
years thereafter, the department shall request information and seek feedback from districts on
their experience with the policy for youth suicide awareness and prevention. The department
shall review this information and may use it to adapt the department's model policy. The
department shall post any information on its website that it has received from districts that it
deems relevant. The department shall not post any confidential information or any
information that personally identifies any student or school employee.
4. (1) Beginning July 1, 2025, a public school or charter school that serves any pupils
in grades seven to twelve and that issues pupil identification cards shall have printed on either
side of the cards:
(a) The three-digit dialing code that directs calls and routes text messages to the
Suicide and Crisis Lifeline, 988; and
(b) The nonemergency telephone number of the local police department; and
(c) May have printed on either side of the cards:
a. The six-digit dialing code that routes text messages to the Crisis Text Line, 741741;
and
b. The telephone number of a local suicide prevention hotline, if such hotline is
available.
(2) If, on July 1, 2025, a public school or charter school subject to the requirements of
this subsection has a supply of unissued pupil identification cards that do not comply with the
requirements of subdivision (1) of this subsection, the school shall issue those cards until that
supply is depleted.
(3) Subdivision (1) of this subsection shall apply to a pupil identification card issued
for the first time to a pupil and to a card issued to replace a damaged or lost card.
5. For the 2027-28 school year and all subsequent school years, each school
district shall update the school district's policy for youth suicide awareness and
prevention training required under subsection 1 of this section to address and include:
(1) Training and guidance on using the Columbia Protocol, also known as the
Columbia-Suicide Severity Rating Scale (C-SSRS), that supports suicide risk
assessment; and
(2) Training on the virtual tool developed and implemented under section
630.099 to assist teachers in knowing how and when to use the virtual tool to assist
students seeking mental health information, help, and support.

HB 3024 4
6. For the 2027-28 school year and all subsequent school years, the model policy
developed under subsection 3 of this section shall be updated to include a requirement
for:
(1) Training and guidance on using the Columbia Protocol, also known as the
Columbia-Suicide Severity Rating Scale (C-SSRS), that supports suicide risk
assessment; and
(2) Training on the virtual tool developed and implemented under section
630.099 to assist teachers in knowing how and when to use the virtual tool to assist
students seeking mental health information, help, and support.
170.307. 1. For school year 2022-23 and each school year thereafter, upon
graduation from high school, pupils in public schools and charter schools shall have received
mental health awareness training given any time during a pupil's four years of high school.
2. Beginning in school year 2022-23, any public school or charter school serving
grades nine through twelve shall provide enrolled students instruction in mental health
awareness. Students with disabilities may participate to the extent appropriate as determined
by the provisions of the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act or Section 504 of the
Rehabilitation Act. Instruction shall be included in the district's existing health or physical
education curriculum. Instruction shall be based on a program established by the department
of elementary and secondary education.
3. For the 2027-28 school year and all subsequent school years, instruction
provided under subsection 2 of this section:
(1) Shall occur in a significantly meaningful manner on a regular basis; and
(2) As part of the program established by the department, shall:
(a) Address suicide awareness at an age-appropriate level;
(b) Provide information about the Suicide and Crisis Lifeline described in
section 170.048;
(c) Provide specific tools for students to use to identify potential suicide signs
such as the Columbia Protocol, also known as the Columbia-Suicide Severity Rating
Scale (C-SSRS), that supports suicide risk assessment;
(d) Promote strategies and protocols for helping students at possible risk of
suicide; and
(e) Include additional resources and information that promote healthier and
more productive lives.
4. (1) This subsection shall be known and may be cited as "Brennan's Law".
(2) For the 2027-28 school year and each subsequent school year, before entering
grade nine, each pupil in public school shall have received mental health awareness
training given any time while such pupil is in grade five to grade eight.

HB 3024 5
(3) For the 2027-28 school year and each subsequent school year, any public
school serving grades five to eight shall provide enrolled students with age-appropriate
instruction in mental health awareness. Students with disabilities may participate to the
extent appropriate as determined by the provisions of the federal Individuals with
Disabilities Education Act (IDEA), 20 U.S.C. Section 1400 et seq., as amended, or
Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. Section 794, as amended.
Instruction shall be included in the district's existing health or physical education
curriculum. Instruction shall be based on a program established by the department of
elementary and secondary education.
[3.] 5. The department of elementary and secondary education shall promulgate rules
to develop a model curriculum to be used by school districts to provide the instruction
required by this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective
only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers
vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant
of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2022, shall be
invalid and void.
630.099. 1. Before July 1, 2027, the Missouri department of mental health's
children's office shall develop and implement a virtual tool to enhance access to mental
health resources in this state.
2. Such virtual tool shall provide:
(1) Information to any individual seeking mental health support;
(2) An online resource directory;
(3) A method to allow an individual to answer screening questions;
(4) A method to provide an assessment of an individual's screening questions to
assist the individual with seeking mental health help and support; and
(5) Any other resources to provide information and support to an individual
seeking mental health support deemed necessary by the department.
✔